Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.130

Disclosure requirements—Grounds for challenge.

(1) When a person is approached in connection with the person's possible appointment as an arbitrator, the person shall disclose any circumstances likely to give rise to justifiable doubts as to the person's impartiality or independence. An arbitrator, from the time of the arbitrator's appointment and throughout the arbitral proceedings, shall without delay disclose any such circumstances to the parties unless they have already been informed of them by the arbitrator.

(2) An arbitrator may be challenged only if circumstances exist that give rise to justifiable doubts as to the arbitrator's impartiality or independence, or if the arbitrator does not possess qualifications agreed to by the parties. A party may challenge an arbitrator appointed by the party, or in whose appointment the party has participated, only for reasons of which the party becomes aware after the appointment has been made.

[ 2015 c 276 s 13.]